Idaho, session 2025, S1063.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-1002, Idaho Code, as amended in Section 1 of
Senate Bill No. 1026, if enacted by the First Regular Session of the Sixty-
eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
22-1002. DEFINITIONS. (1) "Community gardening" means a single plot
of land that is gardened collectively by a group of people. Community gar-
dens can be further divided into single plots or maintained as one (1) large
plot. Entities, including but not limited to schools, food pantries, and
faith-based organizations, often host community gardens. City or county
land bank properties as well as privately owned plots are used for community
gardens.
(2) "Market gardening" means small-scale production of agricultural
products grown to sell through marketing channels such as farmers markets
and community supported agriculture shares.
(3) "Small-scale livestock" means the ownership, care, and raising of
animals in limited numbers for personal use, small-scale production, or ed-
ucational purposes, rather than for large-scale or commercial farming. The
term typically applies to urban, suburban, or small rural properties where
space and resources are more constrained compared to traditional farms.
Regulations for small-scale livestock may include provisions for poultry,
rabbits, bees, miniature pigs, and goats, as well as restrictions on certain
animals, sanitation requirements, noise control, and other public health
and safety measures.
(3) (4) "Urban farming" means farming that produces food crops or
raises animals for personal use or for sale to others and can be larger in
scale than market gardening. Urban farms may be organized as for-profit
businesses operated by individuals or as nonprofit social enterprises
designed to provide food to address food insecurity, provide vocational
training, or address another community issue, typically at the neigh-
borhood level. Urban farms operated as social enterprises are typically
managed by nongovernmental organizations. Urban farming can include indoor
controlled-environment production, including hydroponic and aquaponic sys-
tems, and may involve the responsible rearing of small-scale livestock or
poultry to support food production goals.
(4) (5) "Victory gardening" means producing food at one's residence
primarily for household consumption or donation.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.